Illinois, session 104th, HB372.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Tobacco Accessories and Smoking Herbs 5Control Act is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 685/1)  (from Ch. 23, par. 2358-1)7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8"Tobacco Accessories and Smoking Herbs Control Act".9(Source: P.A. 82-487.)